Massachusetts, session 194th, H3053.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 64N the
following chapter:-
CHAPTER 64O.
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following terms shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of revenue.
“Department”, the department of revenue.
of 4

“Disregarded entity”, an entity that is disregarded as a separate entity from its owner for
federal income tax purposes.
“Employee”, a person defined in clause (h) of section 1 of chapter 151A; provided that an
employee shall include a person who physically commutes to an employer’s location in the
commonwealth regardless of residence and a person who resides in the commonwealth and
works for an employer with a physical presence in the Commonwealth.
“Employer”, a business corporation, non-governmental employer, partnership, or
disregarded entity with a physical presence in the Commonwealth.
Section 2. A city or town that accepts this chapter in the manner provided in section 4 of
chapter 4 may impose a local corporate transportation excise tax upon employers who annually
employ more than 50 employees who travel to work within the Commonwealth.
Section 3. An employer who annually employs 50-99 employees in the commonwealth
shall pay an excise tax amount of $10 per employee, per year, less any annual payments made by
said employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth, or the local
municipality.
Section 4. An employer who annually employs 100-149 employees in the commonwealth
shall pay an excise tax of $20 per employee, per year, less any annual payments made by said
employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth, or the local municipality.
Section 5. An employer who annually employs 150-249 employees in the commonwealth
shall pay an excise tax amount of $40 per employee, per year, less any annual payments made by
of 4

said employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth, or the local
municipality.
Section 6. An employer who annually employs 250-499 employees in the commonwealth
shall pay an excise tax amount of $60 per employee, per year, less any annual payments made by
said employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth, or the local
municipality.
Section 7. An employer who annually employs 500-999 in the commonwealth shall pay
an excise tax amount of $80 per employee, per year, less any annual payments made by said
employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth, or the local municipality.
Section 8. An employer who annually employs 1,000 or more employees in the
commonwealth shall pay an excise tax amount of $100 per employee, per year, less any annual
payments made by said employer for public transit purposes to employees, the Commonwealth,
or the local municipality.
Section 9. Each employer shall remit the excise tax amount owed to the department in a
form and manner determined by the department. All sums received by the commissioner under
this chapter shall, at least quarterly, be distributed, credited and paid by the state treasurer upon
certification of the commissioner to each city or town that has accepted this chapter in proportion
to the assessment provided in this chapter to be used by the municipality for public
transportation-related purposes.
Section 10. The department, in consultation with the executive office of labor and
workforce development, shall establish by regulation the mechanism for administering the excise
tax payor’s obligations under this chapter and shall deduct from an individual entity’s liability
of 4

any annual payments said entity makes to or for in-state Massachusetts employees for public
transit subsidies.
Section 11. The department, in consultation with the executive office of labor and
workforce development, shall establish by regulation an appropriate mechanism for enforcing an
excise tax payor's liability to the city or town that has accepted this chapter if an excise tax payor
does not make a payment to the commissioner. Such enforcement mechanisms may include
assessment of interest on the unpaid liability at a rate not to exceed an annual percentage rate of
18 percent and late fees or penalties at a rate not to exceed 5 percent per month.
SECTION 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate regulations to implement this
act within 180 days of the passage of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect 270 days after the passage of this act.
of 4